District of Columbia statutes.
16-701

Rules and regulations.

The Superior Court may make such rules and regulations for conducting business in the Criminal Division of the court, consistent with statutes applicable to such business and in the manner provided in section 11-946 , as it may deem necessary and proper.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 557, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 555, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(d)(1)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-701.
1973 Ed., § 16-701.